Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 135A.043, is amended to read: 135A.043 RESIDENT TUITION. (a) A student, other than a nonimmigrant alien within the meaning of United States Code, title 8, section 1101, subsection (a), paragraph (15), shall qualify for a resident tuition rate or its equivalent at state universities and colleges if the studentnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end meets all of the following requirements: deleted text begin (1)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end high school attendance within the state for three or more years; deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end graduation from a state high school or attainment within the state of the equivalent of high school graduation; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end in the case of a student without lawful immigration status: deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (A)new text end documentation that the student has complied with selective service registration requirements; and deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (B)new text end if a federal process exists for the student to obtain lawful immigration status, the student must present the higher education institution with documentation from federal immigration authorities that the student has filed an application to obtain lawful immigration statusdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (2) moved to the state for employment purposes and, before moving and before applying for admission to a public postsecondary institution, accepted a full-time job in the state, or is the spouse or dependent of a person meeting this requirement. new text end (b) This section is new text begin a minimum requirement new text end in addition to any other statute, rule, or higher education institution regulationnew text begin , decision,new text end or policy deleted text begin providingdeleted text end new text begin that expandsnew text end eligibility for a resident tuition rate or its equivalent to a student. (c) The Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota is requested to adopt a policy implementing this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning in the fall 2027 academic term and applies to all eligible, currently enrolled students, including those who may have been previously enrolled at nonresident tuition rates. This section does not have any retroactive application and does not entitle students to refunds for nonresident tuition rates paid during prior terms. new text end